test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_stuarrud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - stuárruđ: # MLO checked
    stuárruđ+V+Inf: stuárruđ
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuárum
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: stuáruh
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuáru
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: stuárroon
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: stuáruvettee
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: stuárruv
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: stuárrup
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: stuáruvetteđ
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: stuáruh
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: stuorrum
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: stuorruh
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [stuárui, stuároi]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [stuáruim, stuároim]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [stuáruid, stuároid]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [stuáruin, stuároin]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [stuáruim, stuároim]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [stuáruid, stuároid]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: stuorruu
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: [stuáruččim, stuároččim]
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: [stuáruččih, stuároččih]
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: [stuáruččij, stuároččij]
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: [stuáruččáim, stuároččáim]
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: [stuáruččáid, stuároččáid]
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: [stuáruččáin, stuároččáin]
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: [stuáruččijm, stuároččijm]
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: [stuáruččijd, stuároččijd]
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [stuáruččii, stuároččii]
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg1: stuároom
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg2: stuárooh
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+Sg3: stuáruš
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+Du1: [stuáružeen, stuárožeen]
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+Du2: [stuárušvettee, stuárošvettee]
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+Du3: [stuáružává, stuárožává]
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl1: [stuáružep, stuárožep]
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl2: [stuárušvetteđ, stuárošvetteđ]
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+Pl3: [stuáružeh, stuárožeh]

    stuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [stuáru, stuáro]
    stuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: stuárus
    stuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du1: stuárroon
    stuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du2: stuárroo
    stuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du3: stuárrus
    stuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: stuárrup
    stuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: stuárruđ
    stuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: stuárrus
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [stuáru, stuáro]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: stuárrum
    stuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: [stuáruččii, stuároččii]
    stuárruđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: storruu
    stuárruđ+V+PrsPrc: stuárroo
    stuárruđ+V+PrfPrc: stuárrum
    stuárruđ+V+Actio: stuárrum
    stuárruđ+V+Actio+Ess: stuárumin
    stuárruđ+V+Actio+Loc: stuárumist
    stuárruđ+V+Actio+Ill: stuárumân
    stuárruđ+V+Actio+Com: [stuárudijn, stuárodijn]
#    stuárruđ+V+VAbess: stuáruhennáá
#    stuárruđ+V+VAbess: stuáruhinnáá
    stuárruđ+V+VAbess: [stuáruhánnáá, stuárohánnáá]
